test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_pihted_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Verb - pihteđ: # MLO checked
    pihteđ+V+Inf: pihteđ
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pivtám
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: pivtáh
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pihtá
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pihteen
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: pihtevettee
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: pihtev
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pihtep
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pihtevetteđ
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pihteh
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pihtim
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: pihtih
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: piivtij
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: pivttijm
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: pivttijd
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: pivttijn
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: piivtijm
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: piivtijd
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pihtii
    pihteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: pivtáččim
    pihteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: pivtáččih
    pihteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: pivtáččij
    pihteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: pivtáččáim
    pihteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: pivtáččáid
    pihteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: pivtáččáin
    pihteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: pivtáččijm
    pihteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: pivtáččijd
    pihteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: pivtáččii
    pihteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: pihteem
    pihteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: pihteeh
    pihteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: piivtiš
    pihteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: pivtižeen
    pihteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: piivtišvettee
    pihteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: pivtižává
    pihteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: pivtižep
    pihteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: piivtišvetteđ
    pihteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: pivtižeh
    pihteđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: pivte
    pihteđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: pivtos
    pihteđ+V+Imprt+Du1: pihtoon
    pihteđ+V+Imprt+Du2: pihtee
    pihteđ+V+Imprt+Du3: pihtoos
    pihteđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: pihtoop
    pihteđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: pihteđ
    pihteđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: pihtoos
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: pivte
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: pihtám
    pihteđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: pivtáččii
    pihteđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: pihtáá
    pihteđ+V+PrsPrc: pihtee
    pihteđ+V+PrfPrc: pihtám
    pihteđ+V+Actio+Nom: pihtem
    pihteđ+V+Actio+Ess: pihtemin
    pihteđ+V+Actio+Loc: pihtemist
    pihteđ+V+Actio+Ill: pihtemân
    pihteđ+V+Actio+Com: pivtedijn
    pihteđ+V+VAbess: pivtehánnáá

  Verb - mušteđ: # MLO checked
    mušteđ+V+Inf: mušteđ
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muštám
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: muštáh
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muštá
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: mušteen
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: muštevettee
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: muštev
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: muštep
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: muštevetteđ
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mušteh
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: muštim
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: muštih
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: muuštij
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: muštijm
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: muštijd
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: muštijn
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: muuštijm
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: muuštijd
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: muštii
    mušteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: muštáččim
    mušteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: muštáččih
    mušteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: muštáččij
    mušteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: muštáččáim
    mušteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: muštáččáid
    mušteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: muštáččáin
    mušteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: muštáččijm
    mušteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: muštáččijd
    mušteđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: muštáččii
    mušteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: mušteem
    mušteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: mušteeh
    mušteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: muuštiš
    mušteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: muštižeen
    mušteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: muuštišvettee
    mušteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: muštižává
    mušteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: muštižep
    mušteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: muuštišvetteđ
    mušteđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: muštižeh
    mušteđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: mušte
    mušteđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: muštos
    mušteđ+V+Imprt+Du1: muštoon
    mušteđ+V+Imprt+Du2: muštee
    mušteđ+V+Imprt+Du3: muštoos
    mušteđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: muštoop
    mušteđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: mušteđ
    mušteđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: muštoos
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: mušte
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: muštám
    mušteđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: muštáččii
    mušteđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: muštáá
    mušteđ+V+PrsPrc: muštee
    mušteđ+V+PrfPrc: muštám
    mušteđ+V+Actio+Nom: muštem
    mušteđ+V+Actio+Ess: muštemin
    mušteđ+V+Actio+Loc: muštemist
    mušteđ+V+Actio+Ill: muštemân
    mušteđ+V+Actio+Com: muštedijn
    mušteđ+V+VAbess: muštehánnáá


  Verb - toideđ: # MLO checked 
    toideđ+V+Inf: toideđ
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: toidám
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: toidáh 
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: toidá
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: toideen
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: toidevettee
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: toidev
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: toidep
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: toidevetteđ
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: toideh
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tuidim
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tuidih
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tuuidij
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: tuidijm
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: tuidijd
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: tuidijn
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tuuidijm
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tuuidijd
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tuidii
    toideđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: toidáččim
    toideđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: toidáččih
    toideđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: toidáččij
    toideđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: toidáččáim
    toideđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: toidáččáid
    toideđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: toidáččáin
    toideđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: toidáččijm
    toideđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: toidáččijd
    toideđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: toidáččii
    toideđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: toideem
    toideđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: toideeh
    toideđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: tuuidiš 
    toideđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: tuidižeen
    toideđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: tuuidišvettee
    toideđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: tuidižává
    toideđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: tuidižep
    toideđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: tuuidišvetteđ
    toideđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: tuidižeh

    toideđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: toide
    toideđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: toidos
    toideđ+V+Imprt+Du1: toidoon
    toideđ+V+Imprt+Du2: toidee
    toideđ+V+Imprt+Du3: toidoos
    toideđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: toidoop
    toideđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: toideđ
    toideđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: toidoos
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: toide
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: toidám
    toideđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: toidáččii
    toideđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: toidáá
    toideđ+V+PrsPrc: toidee 
    toideđ+V+PrfPrc: toidám
    toideđ+V+Actio+Nom: toidem
    toideđ+V+Actio+Ess: toidemin
    toideđ+V+Actio+Loc: toidemist
    toideđ+V+Actio+Ill: toidemân
    toideđ+V+Actio+Com: toidedijn
    toideđ+V+VAbess: toidehánnáá
